Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.130

Information submitted under RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120—Limitation on release.

The department of licensing shall not publicly release, unless pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, information submitted as evidence as required by RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel licensees.

[ 2006 c 338 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: See note following RCW 19.112.110.